Hawaii statutes.
§467B-10.5 Violation as unfair practice.
Any person who engages in an act or practice that violates this chapter or
rules adopted or issued shall have engaged in an unfair or deceptive act or
practice in the conduct of a trade or commerce, in violation of section 480-2,
and shall be subject to the penalties and remedies provided for such a
violation. [L 1990, c 129, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 206, §11]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next